Washington statutes.
RCW 36.27.120

Statewide drug prosecution assistance program—Personnel—Review of assignments—Supervision of special deputies.

The project director of the drug prosecution assistance program shall employ up to five attorneys to act as special deputy prosecuting attorneys. A county or counties may request the assistance of one or more of the special deputy prosecuting attorneys. The project director after consultation with the advisory committee shall determine the assignment of the special deputy prosecutors. Within funds appropriated for this purpose, the project director may also employ necessary support staff and purchase necessary supplies and equipment.

The advisory committee shall regularly review the assignment of the special deputy prosecuting attorneys to ensure that the program's impact on the drug abuse problem is maximized.

During the time a special deputy prosecuting attorney is assigned to a county, the special deputy is under the direct supervision of the county prosecuting attorney for that county. The advisory committee may reassign a special deputy at any time: PROVIDED, That adequate notice must be given to the county prosecuting attorney if the special deputy is involved in a case scheduled for trial.

[ 1989 c 271 s 238.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.